Massachusetts, session 194th, H3832.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting the following definitions under the forty third definition:-
"Gold Star parent" shall mean any parent of a member of the armed forces whose death
occurred as a result of injury sustained, illness, or disease contracted, not due to gross negligence
or misconduct of the member, during active service.
"Gold Star spouse" any spouse of a member of the armed forces whose death occurred as
a result of injury sustained, illness, or disease contracted, not due to gross negligence or
misconduct of the member, during active service.
of 1